Louisiana, session 2026, HB902.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IX of Chapter 5-G of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1300.81 and 1300.82, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. TRAUMA-INFORMED TRAINING PROGRAM
§1300.81. Definitions
As used in this Section, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to
them:
(1) "Adverse childhood events" or "ACEs" means potentially traumatic
events occurring before the age of eighteen, including but not limited to any of the
following:
(a) Physical, emotional, or sexual abuse.
(b) Physical or emotional neglect.
(c) Household substance abuse.
(d) Domestic violence.
(e) Parental incarceration.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1039 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 902
(f) Other forms of chronic stress or instability.
(2) "Child education personnel" means any individual employed by or
providing services to a public elementary or secondary school including but not
limited to teachers, administrators, school counselors, school social workers, school
nurses, paraprofessionals, classroom aides, and school resource officers.
(3) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health
(4) "Trauma-informed practices" means policies, procedures, and
interactions that recognize the presence and impact of trauma and respond in ways
that promote student safety, empowerment, and healing while avoiding
re-traumatization.
§1300.82. Trauma-informed training program
A. The department shall develop a comprehensive, evidence-based,
statewide trauma-informed training program for child education personnel.
B. The training program shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
(1) Provide education on the prevalence and impact of adverse childhood
events.
(2) Identify common signs and symptoms of trauma in children and
adolescents.
(3) Provide strategies for responding to trauma-related behaviors in a
supportive and non-punitive manner.
(4) Promote culturally responsive and developmentally appropriate
approaches.
(5) Include guidance on referral pathways to appropriate school-based or
community-based mental health and support services.
(6) Emphasize self-care and secondary trauma prevention for educators and
school staff.
C. The department may consult with the Department of Education, child
welfare agencies, mental health professionals, and other relevant stakeholders in
developing the training curriculum.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1039 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 902
D. The department may provide the training through in-person instruction
or online modules.